Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.470

Eligibility for retirement allowance.

A member who is not a dual member under RCW 41.54.010 must have established or reestablished with the retirement system at least five years of credit for public school service in this state to be entitled to a retirement allowance.

[ 1994 c 298 s 4; 1965 ex.s. c 81 s 4; 1963 ex.s. c 14 s 15; 1947 c 80 s 47; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4995-66. Prior: 1941 c 97 s 7, part; 1939 c 86 s 7, part; 1937 c 221 s 8, part; 1931 c 115 s 7, part; 1923 c 187 s 17, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 4995-8, part.]

NOTES:

Intent—1994 c 298: See note following RCW 41.40.010.

Severability—Effective date—1965 ex.s. c 81: See notes following RCW 41.32.010.

Savings—Severability—Effective date—1963 ex.s. c 14: See notes following RCW 41.32.010.